Utah statutes.
34-29-5.   License -- Posting.

Upon the granting of a license by the board of city commissioners, city council, board of town trustees, or the county executive under this chapter, the city, town, or county treasurer shall within one week after payment of the license fee issue to the applicant entitled to the same a certificate setting forth the fact that such license has been granted. It shall be the duty of all persons who may obtain such license to keep the same publicly exposed to view in a conspicuous place in their offices or places of business.

